Montana, session 2025, HB402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 1-1-525, MCA, is amended to read:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 402

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 402.1
"1-1-525. Montana cowboy hall of fame and western heritage center. (1) There is a The city of
Wolf Point is designated the site of the Montana cowboy hall of fame and western heritage center. Once the
recipient of the grant for site development and project planning authorized pursuant to section 4(7), Chapter 3,
Special Laws of May 2007, determines the location of the Montana cowboy hall of fame, the grant recipient
shall notify the department of commerce and the department of transportation.
(2) Once notified that the location of the Montana cowboy hall of fame is determined, the The
department of commerce and the department of transportation shall identify the site the city of Wolf Point as the
location of the Montana cowboy hall of fame and western heritage center on official state maps. When existing
road signs need replacement, the department of transportation shall provide appropriate markers to recognize
the site."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 402